Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.234

Mortgage loan originator license—Application form and content.

Applicants for a mortgage loan originator license shall apply on a form as prescribed by the director. Each form must contain content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of the director and may be changed or updated as necessary by the director in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, but must not be inconsistent with that required by the nationwide mortgage licensing system *and registry.

[ 2009 c 120 s 14.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "and registry" was removed by 2013 c 29 s 1.

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.